Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB159.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2508(c) of Title 30 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2508. Restrictions on transport, sale, importation or release of nonnative injurious fish.* * *(c) Penalty.--[Any](1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), a person who violates this section commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.(2) A person who negligently or intentionally violates this section commits a misdemeanor of the first degree.12345678910111213141516171819 Section 2. Section 2163(c) of Title 34 is amended to read:§ 2163. Unlawful importation of game or wildlife.* * *(c) Penalties.--(1) Except for endangered or threatened species, a person importing, selling, releasing or possessing game or wildlife or the eggs of any bird contrary to any of the provisions of this section, or causing them to be released or imported, commits a summary offense of the fifth degree. Each bird, egg or animal involved in a violation constitutes a separate offense.(2) [A] Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3), a violation of this section relating to any endangered or threatened species is a misdemeanor of the second degree. Each bird, egg or game or wildlife involved in the violation constitutes a separate offense.(3) A negligent or intentional violation of this section relating to any endangered or threatened species is a misdemeanor of the first degree.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0159PN0117 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021